Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.100

Stock associations—Statement in articles.

If the association is organized with shares of stock, the articles shall state the number of shares which may be issued and if the shares are to have a par value, the par value of each share, and the aggregate par value of all shares; and if the shares are to be without par value it shall be so stated.

[ 1959 c 312 s 10.]